src/assets/dictionaries/th_TH.aff
# Thai Hunspell Affix File
# Basic Thai dictionary configuration

SET UTF-8
TRY เกาฮกาฆะาิีึืัฺุูๆ็่้๊๋์abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ

# Common Thai affixes
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 ่

PFX I Y 1
PFX I 0 ้

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 ๊

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 ๋

# Suffix rules for Thai
SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 น์

SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 ม์

# Repetition rules for common typos
REP 2
REP กข
REP ขค
REP คง
REP งจ
REP จฉ
REP ฉช
REP ชซ
REP ซฌ
REP ฌญ
REP ญฎ
REP ฏฐ
REP ฐฑ
REP ฑฒ
REP ฒณ
REP ณด
REP ดต
REP ตถ
REPถท
REPทธ
REPธน
REPนบ
REPบป
REPปผ
REPผฝ
REPฝพ
REPพฟ
REPฟภ
REPภม
REPมย
REPยร
REPรล
REPลว
REPวศ
REPศษ
REPสห
REPหอ
REPอฮ
